Utah statutes.
11-45-202.   Criteria for loans.
(1)  The board shall make a loan from the fund to a political subdivision only
to finance an energy efficiency project.
(2)  The board may not make a loan from the fund:
(a)  to finance a political subdivision's compliance with the energy code in
the construction of a new building; or
(b)  with a term of less than two years or more than 12 years.
